New York, session 2025-2026, A4903.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Career and technical education pathway to a high school diplo- 4 ma. 1. a. A career and technical education (CTE) pathway to a high 5 school diploma is hereby established. A CTE pathway to a diploma, if 6 made available by a school district shall: 7 (i) result in a regents or local diploma; 8 (ii) differ from the traditional requirements to a regents or local 9 diploma with respect to required assessments, except as otherwise 10 required by federal law; 11 (iii) be made available to all students, including, but not limited to 12 students with disabilities and English language learners. 13 b. A CTE pathway to a diploma shall be based on a course of study 14 designed to provide students with technical knowledge and skills and 15 shall demonstrate that the student is ready for a career as determined 16 by regulations of the commissioner. A CTE pathway to a diploma shall 17 include, but not be limited to: 18 (i) completion of a CTE course of study; 19 (ii) completion of a three-part technical assessment; 20 (iii) completion of work-based learning experiences as provided by the 21 state approved program; and 22 (iv) completion of a work-skills employability profile. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09113-01-5 A. 4903 2 1 c. For purposes of this section, a career and technical education 2 shall include, but not be limited to, a course of study in the following 3 career fields: agriculture education, business and marketing education, 4 family and consumer sciences education, health occupations education, 5 technical education, technology education, and trade and industrial 6 education. 7 2. The board of regents shall promulgate such regulations of the 8 commissioner as may be necessary to establish the curriculum, assess- 9 ments and any other criteria that students must achieve to earn a 10 regents or local diploma via a CTE pathway. 11 3. Students first entering ninth grade in the two thousand twenty-six- 12 -two thousand twenty-seven school year and thereafter shall be eligible 13 to earn a diploma via a CTE pathway if made available by a school 14 district. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. Effective immediately, 16 the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation neces- 17 sary for the implementation of this act on its effective date are 18 authorized to be made and completed on or before such effective date.